Washington statutes.
RCW 43.82.035

Predesign process for requests to lease, purchase, or build facilities for state programs—Approval of plans for major leased facilities.

(1) The office of financial management shall design and implement a modified predesign process for any space request to lease, purchase, or build facilities that involve (a) the housing of new state programs, (b) a major expansion of existing state programs, or (c) the relocation of state agency programs. This includes the consolidation of multiple state agency tenants into one facility. The office of financial management shall define facilities that meet the criteria described in (a) and (b) of this subsection.

(2) State agencies shall submit modified predesigns to the office of financial management and the legislature. Modified predesigns must include a problem statement, an analysis of alternatives to address programmatic and space requirements, proposed locations, and a financial assessment. For proposed projects of twenty thousand gross square feet or less, the agency may provide a cost-benefit analysis, rather than a life-cycle cost analysis, as determined by the office of financial management.

(3) Projects that meet the capital requirements for predesign on major facility projects with an estimated project cost of 10 million dollars or more pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW shall not be required to prepare a modified predesign.

(4) The office of financial management shall require state agencies to identify plans for major leased facilities as part of the ten-year capital budget plan. State agencies shall not enter into new or renewed leases of more than one million dollars per year unless such leases have been approved by the office of financial management except when the need for the lease is due to an unanticipated emergency. The regular termination date on an existing lease does not constitute an emergency. The department of enterprise services shall notify the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees if an emergency situation arises.

(5) For project proposals in which there are estimates of operational savings, the office of financial management shall require the agency or agencies involved to provide details including but not limited to fund sources and timelines.

[ 2021 c 54 s 3; 2015 c 225 s 75; 2007 c 506 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 54: See note following RCW 43.88.110.

Findings—Intent—2007 c 506: "The legislature finds that the capital stock of facilities owned and leased by state agencies represents a significant financial investment by the citizens of the state of Washington. Capital construction projects funded in the state's capital budget require diligent analysis and approval by the governor and the legislature. In some cases, long-term leases obligate state agencies to a larger financial commitment than some capital construction projects without a comparable level of diligence. State facility analysis and portfolio management can be strengthened through greater oversight and support from the office of financial management and the legislature and with input from stakeholders.

The legislature finds that the state lacks specific policies and standards on conducting life-cycle cost analysis to determine the cost-effectiveness of owning or leasing state facilities and lacks clear guidance on when and how to use it. Further, there is limited oversight and review of the results of life-cycle cost analyses in the capital project review process. Unless decision makers are provided a thorough economic analysis, they cannot identify the most cost-effective alternative or identify opportunities for improving the cost-effectiveness of state facility alternatives.

The legislature finds that the statewide accounting system limits the ability of the office of financial management and the legislature to analyze agency expenditures that include only leases for land, buildings, and structures. Additionally, other statewide data systems that track state-owned and leased facility information are limited, onerous, and inflexible.

Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to strengthen the office of financial management's oversight role in state facility analysis and decision making. Further, it is the intent of the legislature to support the office of financial management's and the *department of general administration's need for technical expertise and data systems to conduct thorough analysis, long-term planning, and state facility portfolio management by providing adequate resources in the capital and operating budgets." [ 2007 c 506 s 1.]

*Reviser's note: The "department of general administration" was renamed the "department of enterprise services" by 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 107.